Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.250

University designated as recipient of all federal aid to agricultural experiment stations.

The agricultural experiment stations in connection with Washington State University shall be under the direction of said board of regents of said university for the purpose of conducting experiments in agriculture according to the terms of section one of an act of congress approved March 2, 1887, and entitled "An Act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the colleges established in the several states, under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and of the acts supplementary thereto." The said university and experiment stations shall be entitled to receive all the benefits and donations made and given to similar institutions of learning in other states and territories of the United States by the legislation of the congress of the United States now in force, or that may be enacted, and particularly to the benefits and donations given by the provisions of an act of congress entitled "An Act donating public lands to the several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agricultural and mechanic arts," approved July 2, 1862, and all acts supplementary thereto, including the acts entitled "An Act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with colleges established in the several states under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and of the acts supplementary thereto," which said last entitled act was approved March 2, 1887; also, "An Act to apply a portion of the proceeds of the public lands to the more complete endowment and support of the colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts, established under the provisions of an act of congress approved July 2, 1862," which said last mentioned act was approved August 30, 1890.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.250. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 247 s 10; RRS s 4581; prior: 1897 c 118 s 199; 1891 c 145 s 10. Formerly RCW 28.80.210.]